Utah statutes.
31A-27a-605.   Allowance of contingent and unliquidated claims.
(1)  As used in this section, "claim" means a demand for payment pursuant to
Section 31A-27a-601 under the terms and conditions of a contract issued by the
insurer as a result of a known accident, casualty, disaster, loss, event, or
occurrence.
(2) (a)  A claim of an insured or third party may be allowed under Section
31A-27a-603, regardless of the fact that it is contingent or unliquidated if:
(i)  any contingency is removed in accordance with Subsection (3); and
(ii)  the value of the claim is determined in accordance with Subsection (4).
(b)  A claim is contingent if:
(i)  the accident, casualty, disaster, loss, event, or occurrence insured,
reinsured, or bonded against occurs on or before the date fixed under Section
31A-27a-601; and
(ii)  the act or event triggering the insurer's obligation to pay has not
occurred as of the date fixed under Section 31A-27a-401.
(c)  A claim is unliquidated if the insurer's obligation to pay is
established, but the amount of the claim has not been determined.
(3) (a)  Unless the receivership court directs otherwise, a contingent claim
may be allowed if:
(i)  the claimant presents proof of the insurer's obligation to pay reasonably
satisfactory to the liquidator; or
(ii)  subject to Subsection (3)(b), the claim is based on a cause of action
against an insured of the insurer, and:
(A)  it may be reasonably inferred from proof presented upon the claim that
the claimant would be able to obtain a judgment; and
(B)  the person furnishes suitable proof.
(b)  A contingent claim may not be allowed under Subsection (3)(a)(ii)(B) if
the receivership court for good cause shown shall otherwise direct that no
further valid claims can be made against the insurer arising out of the cause
of action other than those already presented.
(4) (a)  An unliquidated claim may be allowed if its amount has been
determined.
(b)  If the amount of an unliquidated claim filed pursuant to Section 31A-
27a-601 remains undetermined, the valuation of the unliquidated claim may be
made by estimate whenever the liquidator determines that:
(i)  liquidation of the claim would unduly delay the administration of the
liquidation proceeding; or
(ii)  the administrative expense of processing and adjudicating the claim or
group of claims of a similar type would be unduly excessive when compared with
the property that is estimated to be available for distribution with respect
to the claim.
(c)  Any estimate shall be based on an accepted method of valuing a claim with
reasonable certainty at the claim's net present value, such as an actuarial
evaluation.
(5) (a)  Notwithstanding the other provisions of this section, a claim for the
value or breach of a life insurance policy, disability income insurance
policy, long-term care insurance policy, or annuity may not result in or serve
as the basis of any liability of a reinsurer of the insurer.
(b)  A reinsurer's liability to the insurer shall be determined exclusively on
the basis of its contracts of reinsurance and Section 31A-27a-513.
(6) (a)  The liquidator may petition the receivership court to set a date
certain before which all claims under this section shall be final.
(b)  In addition to the notice requirements of Section 31A-27a-107, the
liquidator shall give notice of the filing of the petition to all claimants
with claims that remain contingent or unliquidated under this section.
